District of Columbia statutes.
34-1506

Duties of the electric company.

(a)

(1)

The electric company shall provide distribution services to all customers and electricity suppliers on rates, terms of access, and conditions that are comparable to the electric company’s own use of its distribution system. The electric company shall not operate its distribution system in a manner that favors the electricity supply of the electric company’s affiliates.

(2)

To the extent this provision is not preempted by federal law or regulation, the electric company shall provide transmission services to all customers and electricity suppliers on rates, terms, and conditions that are comparable to the electric company’s own use of its transmission system.

(b)

The electric company shall maintain the reliability of its distribution system in accordance with applicable orders, tariffs, and regulations of the Commission.

History

May 9, 2000, D.C. Law 13-107, § 106, 47 DCR 1091

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1504.

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Heat Wave Safety Temporary Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Law 17-33, October 18, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 10703).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Heat Wave Safety Temporary Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Law 17-242, October 21, 2008, law notification 55 DCR 11705).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 2 of Heat Wave Safety Temporary Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 18-80, December 8, 2009, law notification 57 DCR 2).
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-35 added a section to read as follows: “Sec. 106a. Disconnection of service in extreme temperature prohibited.
“(a) The electric company shall not disconnect residential electric service during the day preceding, and the day of, a forecast of extreme temperature. If the forecast of extreme temperature precedes a holiday or weekend day, the electric company shall not disconnect residential electric service on any day during the holiday or weekend.
“(b) For the purposes of this section, the term ”forecast of extreme temperature“ means a National Weather Service forecast that the heat index for the District of Columbia will be 95 degrees Fahrenheit or above at any time during a day.”.
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-35 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
Section 2 of D.C. Law 19-176 added D.C. Law 13-107, § 106a, to read as follows:
“Disconnection of service in extreme temperature prohibited.
“(a) For the purposes of this section, the term ‘forecast of extreme temperature’ means a National Weather Service forecast that the heat index for the District of Columbia will be 95 degrees Fahrenheit or above at any time during a day.
“(b) The electric company shall not disconnect residential electric service during the day preceding, and the day of, a forecast of extreme temperature. If the forecast of extreme temperature precedes a holiday or weekend day, the electric company shall not disconnect residential electric service on any day during the holiday or weekend.”
Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 19-176 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-107, § 106a, prohibiting disconnection of service in extreme temperature, see § 2 of the Heat Wave Safety Temporary Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Law 20-21, October 3, 2013, 60 DCR 10878).
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-107, § 106a, concerning disconnection of service in extreme temperature, see § 2 of the Heat Wave Safety Temporary Amendment Act of 2014 (Nov. 18, 2014, D.C. Law 20-138, 61 DCR 7185).
For temporary (225 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-107, § 106a, see § 2 of the Heat Wave Safety Temporary Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Law 21-25, Sept. 23, 2015, 62 DCR 9454).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Heat Wave Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-68, July 9, 2007, 54 DCR 6824).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Heat Wave Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-439, July 16, 2008, 55 DCR 8288).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2 of Heat Wave Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-154, July 28, 2009, 56 DCR 6344).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-107, § 106a, concerning disconnection of service in extreme temperature, see § 2 of the Heat Wave Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-83, June 14, 2013, 60 DCR 9303, 20 DCSTAT 1438).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-107, § 106a, concerning disconnection of service in extreme temperature, see § 2 of the Heat Wave Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-349, June 17, 2014, 61 DCR 6117).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-107, § 106a, prohibiting the electric company from disconnecting residential electric service when the heat index is forecasted to be 95 degrees Fahrenheit or above, see § 2 of the Heat Wave Safety Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-82, June 17, 2015, 62 DCR 8829, 21 DCSTAT 1475).
For temporary (90 days) addition of D.C. Law 13-107, § 106a, concerning disconnection of service in extreme temperature, see § 2 of the Heat Wave Safety Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-130, July 31, 2015, 62 DCR 10862).